Massachusetts, session 194th, H3956.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding section 25C of chapter 111 of the General Laws and any other general 
or special law or regulation to the contrary, Fairview Hospital located in the town of Great 
Barrington shall be exempt from determination of need requirements for a substantial capital 
expenditure, as defined in section 25B of said chapter 111, to replace and expand its existing 
inpatient and outpatient facilities within its 25-bed complement, including the addition of a 
magnetic resonance imaging unit.